Tennessee, session 114, SB1112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3803, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(i) A local board of education or public charter school governing body shall not
remove a material from a library collection for the sole reason that the material is
religious.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1112
002144
- 1 -